Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Article V Powers of Enforcement Personnel
21-28-5.07.1.
Application for use in other cases.

Notwithstanding any provision of §

21-28-5.07

, the attorney general may apply ex parte to the presiding justice of the superior court for an order authorizing the state police, local police or an investigator appointed pursuant to §

42-9-8.1

designated by the attorney general, to use controlled substances seized as contraband in matters which have been finally disposed by the courts, in the investigation of other controlled substance violations.

Prior to the application by the attorney general, the law enforcement agency requesting the use of the controlled substance shall submit to the attorney general, or an assistant attorney general designated by the attorney general, an enforcement plan outlining the proposed use of the controlled substances.

The attorney general or an assistant attorney general specially designated by the attorney general may apply ex parte to the presiding justice of the superior court for an order authorizing the use of controlled substances seized as contraband in matters which have been finally disposed of by the courts in the investigation of other controlled substance violations. Each application shall be in writing, subscribed and sworn to by the applicant. The application shall contain:

The identity of the officer making the application;

A full and complete statement of facts and circumstances relied upon by the applicant to justify his or her belief that an order should be issued, which shall include details as to the particular offense that has been, is being, or is about to be committed, and the identity of the person or persons, who has committed, is committing or is about to commit a particular designated offense;

The court case number(s), the name of the defendant(s), and the status of the case from which the controlled substances have been derived; and

The quantity and type of controlled substances which are sought to be used.

The presiding justice may require the applicant to furnish additional testimony under oath or produce other documentary evidence in support of the application.

Allegation of fact in the application may be based either upon the personal knowledge of the applicant or upon information and belief. If the applicant personally knows the fact alleged it must be so stated. If the facts establishing reasonable cause are derived in whole or in part from the statements of persons other than the applicant, the sources of that information and belief must be either disclosed or described, and the application must contain facts establishing the existence and reliability of the informant or the reliability of the information supplied by him or her. The application must also state, as far as possible, the basis of the informant’s knowledge or belief. If the applicant’s information and belief is derived from tangible evidence or recorded oral evidence, a copy or detailed description of it should be annexed to or included in the application. Affidavits of persons other than the applicant must be submitted in conjunction with the application if they tend to support any fact or conclusion alleged in the application. The accompanying affidavit may be based either on personal knowledge of the affiant, or information and belief with the source of the information and belief and reasons for it specified.

An application may be made to the senior associate justice if the presiding justice shall deem it appropriate to disqualify himself or herself from hearing the application.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 295, § 1.

21-28-5.07.2.
Issuance of orders.

Upon an application as provided in §

21-28-5.07.1

the presiding justice of the superior court, or the senior associate justice of the superior court when the presiding justice shall disqualify himself or herself from entering the order, may enter an ex parte order, authorizing the use of controlled substances seized as contraband if the justice determines on the basis of the evidence submitted that:

There is probable cause to believe that a particular, identified individual is committing, has committed or is about to commit a particular designated offense;

It has been demonstrated that the use of the controlled substances will assist law enforcement officials in the investigation of felony violations of this chapter or felony violations of other criminal laws of this state and that normal investigative procedures have been tried and have failed or reasonably appear to be unlikely to succeed if tried or to be too dangerous.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 54.

21-28-5.07.3.
Disclosure.

Notwithstanding the decision of the justice, any materials submitted or testimony offered pursuant to §

21-28-5.07.1

shall be kept under seal and not available for inspection, except after a hearing by the issuing justice who shall determine, prior to their release, that the sealing of the records is no longer necessary for the protection of the integrity of the investigation or that the protection of any sources of information which contributed to the investigation will not be compromised by the release.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 54.

21-28-5.07.4.
Control of controlled substance.

Any controlled substance, which has been authorized to be used by the state police, local police or investigator appointed pursuant to §

42-9-8.1

designated by the attorney general in investigations of controlled substance violations shall be kept under the physical control of the requesting law enforcement agency until the controlled substance is to be used in an investigation.

When used in an investigation, at no time shall any substantial amount of the controlled substance be physically delivered to a person unless the police intend to and are able to immediately arrest the person to whom the controlled substance was delivered for commission of a felony criminal offense.

Upon final disposition of all matters regarding the use of any controlled substances in accordance with §

21-28-5.07

.1, the controlled substance shall be destroyed in accordance with the provisions of §

21-28-5.07

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 54.

21-28-5.07.5.
Rules and regulations.

The attorney general shall promulgate rules and regulations in furtherance of the administration of his or her responsibilities pursuant to this chapter and concerning the custody and control of all controlled substances utilized pursuant to §

21-28-5.07.1

and no application for use of controlled substances shall be applied for until the rules and regulations have been formally approved by the attorney general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 54.

21-28-5.08.
Burden of proof.

It shall not be necessary for the state to negate any exemption or exception set forth in this chapter in any complaint, information, indictment, or other pleading or in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding under this chapter, and the burden of pleading and proof of any exemption or exception shall be upon the person claiming its benefit.

In the absence of proof that a person is the duly authorized holder of an appropriate registration or an official written order issued under federal law, he or she shall be presumed not to be the holder of the registration form, and the burden of proof shall be upon him or her to rebut the presumption.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-5.09.
Revocation of license of persons convicted.

On the conviction of any person of the violation of any provision of this chapter, a copy of the judgment or decision and the sentence, and of the opinion of the court, if one is filed, shall immediately be sent by the clerk of the court to the director of health, who in turn shall notify the board, division, commission, officer, or officers by whom the convicted person was licensed or registered to practice his or her profession, trade, occupation, or to carry on his or her business. The licensing board, division, commission, officer, or officers shall enter upon its records a statement of the conviction and shall immediately revoke the license or registration and notify the director of health within seven (7) days to that effect. On the application of any person whose license or registration has been revoked, and upon proper showing and for good cause, the board, division, commission, officer, or officers may reinstate the license or registration, and when it does it shall so notify the director of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-5.10.
Inspection of records — Information or knowledge obtained confidential.

Prescriptions, orders, and records required by this chapter, and stocks of controlled substances, shall be open for inspection only to federal, state, county, and municipal officers, whose duty it is to enforce the laws of this state or of the United States relating to controlled substances. No person having information or knowledge by virtue of his or her office of any prescription, order, or record shall divulge or shall be required to divulge that information or knowledge, except in connection with a prosecution or proceeding in court or before a licensing or registration board or officer to which prosecution or proceeding the person to whom the prescription, orders, or records relate is a party. Any personal records of individual use of controlled substances shall be destroyed after two (2) years unless the records relate to an on-going judicial proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-5.11.
Suspension of license or registration of drug dependent persons.

If any person licensed or registered to practice his or her profession, trade, occupation, or carry on his or her business shall at any time, after a fair hearing held upon reasonable notice, and upon the production of sufficient evidence, is found by the director of health to be a drug dependent person, then the director shall, within seven (7) days after the hearing, give notice in writing to the board, division, commission, officer, or officers issuing a license to the practitioner or nurse, that the practitioner, or nurse is a drug dependent person, and the board, division, commission, officer, or officers empowered to issue the license or registration shall in regular course examine the facts in the case and shall, in their judgment, suspend the license or registration and shall immediately notify the director of health that the license or registration has been suspended, and the license or registration shall remain suspended until the time as the director of health shall notify the board, division, commission, officer, or officers empowered to issue the license or registration that in the opinion of the director of health the person whose license or registration is suspended is no longer a drug dependent person, and upon that notice the license or registration may be reissued by the board, commission, officer, or officers empowered to issue the license or registration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-5.12.
Appropriations and disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums that it may deem necessary for the payment of the necessary expenses incurred by the department in the performance of its duties; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sums or so much of them as is required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-5.13.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of it to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-5.14.
Judicial review.

All final determinations, findings, and conclusions of the director of health under this chapter shall be final and conclusive decisions of the matters involved, except that any person aggrieved by the decision may obtain review of the decision in the superior court. Findings of fact by the director of health, if supported by substantial evidence, shall be conclusive. Judicial review shall be conducted subject to the provisions of §

42-35-15

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.